Idaho statutes. Title 22 AGRICULTURE AND HORTICULTURE
Chapter 41
AGRICULTURAL LABOR LAW

Sec.

§ 22-4101 — 22-4113. Short title — Definitions — Agricultural labor board and fund created — Employees’ rights — Employers’ rights — Unfair labor practices — Lawful activities — Petition — Hearing — Representatives — Election — “Collective bargaining” defined — Power of the board — Hearings — Subpoenas — Penalties — Jurisdiction of courts — Powers — Limitation of provisions. [Repealed.]